Utah statutes.
26-2-14.   Fetal death certificate -- Filing and registration requirements.

(1) A fetal death certificate shall be filed for each fetal death which occurs in this state. The certificate shall be filed within five days after delivery with the local registrar or as otherwise directed by the state registrar. The certificate shall be registered if it is completed and filed in accordance with this chapter.

(2)  When a dead fetus is delivered in an institution, the institution administrator or his designated representative shall prepare and file the fetal death certificate.  The attending physician shall state in the certificate the cause of death and sign the certificate.

(3)  When a dead fetus is delivered outside an institution, the physician in attendance at or immediately after delivery shall complete, sign, and file the fetal death certificate.

(4)  When a fetal death occurs without medical attendance at or immediately after the delivery or when inquiry is required by Title 26, Chapter 4, Utah Medical Examiner Act, the medical examiner shall investigate the cause of death and prepare and file the certificate of fetal death within five days after taking charge of the case.

(5)  When a fetal death occurs in a moving conveyance and the dead fetus is first removed from the conveyance in this state or when a dead fetus is found in this state and the place of death is unknown, the death shall be registered in this state. The place where the dead fetus was first removed from the conveyance or found shall be considered the place of death.

(6)  Final disposition of the dead fetus may not be made until the fetal death certificate has been registered.

